morphophonology/foma/redup.foma
define C {w}|{y}|{w̓}|{y̓}|{m̓}|{m}|{n̓}|{n}|{p}|{p̓}|{t}|{t̓}|{k}|{kʷ}|{k̓}|{k̓ʷ}|{c}|{c̓}|{č}|{č̓}|{q}|{qʷ}|{ʔ}|{ḥ}|{ʕ}|{s}|{š}|{x}|{x̌}|{xʷ}|{x̌ʷ}|{h}|{ɬ}|{ƛ}|{ƛ̓};
define V i|u|e|o|a;
define Vns i|u|a;
define L C|V;
define CVL  C V L;
define CVC C V C;
define VC V C;
define CC C C;
define CV C V;
define CVns C Vns;

# put nouns and verbs through redup separately
# so as to be able to send them through different 
# inflectional systems



define MorphsV1 [[0:"<" "dstr-":CVL  0:">"]|
                 [0:"<" "dstr-":CC  0:">"]]* VerbStems;

define MorphsN1 [[0:"<" "dstr-":CVL  0:">"]|
                 [0:"<" "dstr-":CC  0:">"]]* NounStems;

# note special case for CV(h) root ʔa, qa, for now
# we redup with the 'h' but this may be incorrect

define MarkBaseCVL C V L -> "<" ... ">" || "√" _ [ %( | L | .#. ] ;
define MarkBaseCC  C C  ->  "<" ... ">" || "√" _ ;

# remove temp H
# this is ugly!

# block with a +NOREDGLOT+ tag, eg ʔal-ʔalʔal
define GlottalizeL l -> {l̕} ||  _ ">" ~${+NOREDGLOT+} "√" "<" ?+ l ">" [ L | .#. ] ;

define PreEqV1 MorphsV1 .o. MarkBaseCVL .o. MarkBaseCC;
define PreEqN1 MorphsN1 .o. MarkBaseCVL .o. MarkBaseCC;

define InsertSchwa [..] -> "ə" || "<" C _ C ">" ?* "<";  
define RemoveBrackets "<"|">" -> 0;  # leave radical symobl for use in RED2

define PrePostRedV1 _eq(PreEqV1,"<",">") .o. InsertSchwa
                                      .o. GlottalizeL
                                      .o. RemoveBrackets;

define PrePostRedN1 _eq(PreEqN1,"<",">") .o. InsertSchwa 
                                      .o. GlottalizeL
                                      .o. RemoveBrackets;

# allow RED1 to occur before RED2

# get the subset of verbs which do a special redup pattern
# (nonschwa but use i instead of V)
define GetIʔREDUP [?* ?*:{+IʔREDUP+} ?*:?*  ];
define GetIREDUP [?* ?*:{+IREDUP+} ?*:?*  ];
define GetʔREDUP [?* ?*:{+ʔREDUP+} ?*:?*  ];

# need to allow the Iʔ guys to also surface without the ʔ

define SpecialIʔPostRedV1 GetIʔREDUP & PrePostRedV1;
define SpecialIPostRedV1 [GetIREDUP & PrePostRedV1]|SpecialIʔPostRedV1;
define SpecialʔPostRedV1 GetʔREDUP & PrePostRedV1;

define SpecialIʔPostRedN1 GetIʔREDUP & PrePostRedN1;
define SpecialIPostRedN1 [GetIREDUP & PrePostRedN1]|SpecialIʔPostRedN1 ;
define SpecialʔPostRedN1 GetʔREDUP & PrePostRedN1;

define PostRedV1 PrePostRedV1 - SpecialIPostRedV1 - SpecialʔPostRedV1 - SpecialIʔPostRedV1;
define PostRedN1 PrePostRedN1 - SpecialIPostRedN1 - SpecialʔPostRedN1 - SpecialIʔPostRedN1;

define MorphsV2IʔREDUP [ 0:"<" "attn-":C 0:">" 0:"i" 0:"ʔ" ]* SpecialIʔPostRedV1;
define MorphsV2IREDUP [ 0:"<" "attn-":C 0:">" 0:"i" ]* SpecialIPostRedV1;
define MorphsV2ʔREDUP [ 0:"<" "attn-":C 0:V 0:">" 0:"ʔ" ]* SpecialʔPostRedV1;

define MorphsN2IʔREDUP [ 0:"<" "attn-":C 0:">" 0:"i" 0:"ʔ" ]* SpecialIʔPostRedN1;
define MorphsN2IREDUP [ 0:"<" "attn-":C 0:">" 0:"i" ]* SpecialIPostRedN1;
define MorphsN2ʔREDUP [ 0:"<" "attn-":C 0:V 0:">" 0:"ʔ" ]* SpecialʔPostRedN1;

define MorphsV2  [ [ 0:"<" "attn-":CVns 0:">" ]    |
                   [ 0:"<" "attn-":C 0:">" 0:"i" ] ]* PostRedV1;
define MorphsN2  [ [ 0:"<" "attn-":CVns 0:">" ]    |
                   [ 0:"<" "attn-":C 0:">" 0:"i" ] ]* PostRedN1;

define MarkBaseCVns C Vns -> "<" ... ">" || "√" _;
define MarkBaseCS C -> "<" ... ">" || "√" _  [ "ə" | C ]  ;
define MarkBaseCSpecial C -> "<" ... ">" || "√" _  [ L | .#. ];
define MarkBaseCVSpecial C V -> "<" ... ">" || "√" _  [ L | .#. ];

define PreEqV2 [ MorphsV2 .o. MarkBaseCVns .o. MarkBaseCS    ]|
                      [ MorphsV2IʔREDUP .o. MarkBaseCSpecial ]|
                      [ MorphsV2IREDUP .o. MarkBaseCSpecial  ]|
                      [ MorphsV2ʔREDUP .o. MarkBaseCVSpecial ];

define PreEqN2 [ MorphsN2 .o. MarkBaseCVns .o. MarkBaseCS    ]|
                      [ MorphsN2IʔREDUP .o. MarkBaseCSpecial ]|
                      [ MorphsN2IREDUP .o. MarkBaseCSpecial  ]|
                      [ MorphsN2ʔREDUP .o. MarkBaseCVSpecial ];


# note: this looks like it's overgenerating/overapplying!
# FIXME ^^^
define ReplaceS [..] -> "s" || .#. _ ?* "s" "√";
# define ReplaceW [..] -> "xʷ" || .#. _"<" ?* ">" "xʷ" "√" ;
define DeleteS "s" -> 0 ||  _ "√";

define RemoveMarks "<"|">"|{+IREDUP+}|{+ʔREDUP+}|{+IʔREDUP+}|{+NOREDGLOT+} -> 0; 

define PostRedV2 _eq(PreEqV2, "<",">") .o. RemoveMarks;

define PostRedN2 _eq(PreEqN2, "<",">") .o. ReplaceS
                                       .o. DeleteS 
                                       .o. RemoveMarks;

## RED3 is CVC -> CVC-VC

# mark top with <intns>
# define MT [ L* C V C "<intns>":0 [ L+ | 0 ] ] | [ [ʔ|q] a "<intns>":0 ];
# ^^ this fixes CCVC redups, but leads to lexical ambiguity CVC<intns>VC~CVCVC<intns>
define MT [ ?* C (V) C "<intns>":0 [ L+ | 0 ] ] | [ [ʔ|q] a "<intns>":0 ];
# insert <VC> patterns on bottom
define InsVC [ ?* ?:"√" C V C 0:"<" 0: VC 0:">" ?* ];

# Note this treats as obligatory
define Morphs3V MT .o. PostRedV2 .o. InsVC;
define Morphs3N MT .o. PostRedN2 .o. InsVC;

define MarkBaseVC V C -> "<" ... ">" || "√" C _ ;
define RemoveMarks "<"|">" -> 0; 
define RemoveTempH h -> 0 || [q|ʔ] [a h]*  a _  .#. ;

define EqRedV _eq(Morphs3V .o. MarkBaseVC,  "<", ">");
define EqRedN _eq(Morphs3N .o. MarkBaseVC,  "<", ">");

define PostRedV [ EqRedV |  PostRedV2 ] .o. RemoveMarks .o. RemoveTempH;
define PostRedN [ EqRedN |  PostRedN2 ] .o. RemoveMarks ;
